Utah statutes.
76-4-201.   Conspiracy -- Elements of offense.
For purposes of this part a person is guilty of conspiracy when he, intending
that conduct constituting a crime be performed, agrees with one or more
persons to engage in or cause the performance of the conduct and any one of
them commits an overt act in pursuance of the conspiracy, except where the
offense is a capital felony, a felony against the person, arson, burglary, or
robbery, the overt act is not required for the commission of conspiracy.
